Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.010

Definitions.

The following words or terms shall have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Certificate of competency holder" means an individual who has satisfactorily met the qualifications and has received a certificate of competency from the state director of fire protection under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor" means a person or organization that offers to undertake the execution of contracts for the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of a fire protection sprinkler system or any part of such a system.

(3) "Fire protection sprinkler system" means an assembly of underground and/or overhead piping or conduit beginning at the connection to the primary water supply, whether public or private, that conveys water with or without other agents to dispersal openings or devices to extinguish, control, or contain fire and to provide protection from exposure to fire or other products of combustion.

(4) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license" means the license issued by the state director of fire protection to a fire protection sprinkler system contractor upon an application being approved, the fee being paid, and the satisfactory completion of the requirements of this chapter. The license shall be issued in the name of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor with the name or names of the certificate of competency holder noted thereon.

(5) "NFPA 13-D" means whatever standard that is used by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in one or two-family residential dwellings or mobile homes.

(6) "NFPA 13-R" means whatever standard that is used by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to four stories in height.

(7) "Inspection" means a visual examination of a fire protection sprinkler system or portion of the system to verify that the system appears to be in operating condition and is free from physical damage and complies with the applicable statutes and regulations adopted by the state director of fire protection.

(8) "Installation" means the initial placement of fire protection sprinkler system equipment or the extension, modification, or alteration of equipment after the initial placement. Installation shall include the work from a street or main water access throughout the entire building.

(9) "Maintenance" means to maintain in the condition of repair that provides performance as originally planned.

(10) "Organization" means a corporation, partnership, firm, or other business association, governmental entity, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(11) "Person" means a natural person, including an owner, manager, partner, officer, employee, or occupant.

(12) "Service" means to repair or test.

[ 1990 c 177 s 2.]